Missouri, session 2026, SB1158.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 542.271, RSMo, is repealed and fifteen
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
542.271, 571.801, 571.802, 571.803, 571.804, 571.805, 571.806,
571.808, 571.809, 571.810, 571.811, 571.812, 571.813, 571.814,
and 571.815, to read as follows:
542.271. 1. A warrant may be issued to search for and
seize, or photograph, copy or record any of the following:
(1) Property, article, material, or substance that
constitutes evidence of the commission of a criminal
offense; or
(2) Property which has been stolen or acquired in any
other manner declared an offense by chapters 569 and 570; or
(3) Property owned by any person furnishing public
communications services to the general public subject to the
regulations of the public service commission if such person
has failed to remove the property within a reasonable time
after receipt of a written notice from a peace officer
stating that such property is being used as an
instrumentality in the commission of an offense; or

SB 1158 2
(4) Property for which possession is an offense under
the law of this state; or
(5) Property for which seizure is authorized or
directed by any statute of this state; or
(6) Property which has been used by the owner or used
with his acquiescence or consent as a raw material or as an
instrument to manufacture or produce any thing for which
possession is an offense under the laws of this state.
2. A warrant may be issued to search for and rescue a
kidnapped person.
3. A warrant may be issued to search for any person
for whom a valid felony arrest warrant is outstanding.
4. A warrant may be issued to search for and seize any
deceased human fetus or corpse, or part thereof.
5. A warrant may be issued to search for and seize any
firearm in the possession of a person subject to an extreme
risk protection order or temporary extreme risk protection
order under sections 571.801 to 571.815 if there is probable
cause to believe the person is in possession of one or more
firearms.
6. The provisions of sections 542.261 to 542.296 and
section 542.301 shall prevail over any rules and regulations
promulgated by any state governmental agency, commission or
board, to the contrary notwithstanding.
571.801. Sections 571.801 to 571.815 shall be known
and may be cited as the "Firearm Violence Prevention Act".
571.802. As used in sections 571.801 to 571.815, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Extreme risk protection order", either a
temporary order or a continuing order granted under sections
571.801 to 571.815;

SB 1158 3
(2) "Family or household member", with respect to a
respondent, any:
(a) Person related by blood, marriage, or adoption to
the respondent;
(b) Person who has a child in common with the
respondent, regardless of whether such person has been
married to the respondent or has lived together with the
respondent at any time;
(c) Person who regularly resides with the respondent
or regularly resided with the respondent within the last six
months;
(d) Domestic partner of the respondent;
(e) Person who has a biological or legal parent-child
relationship with the respondent, including stepparents and
stepchildren and grandparents and grandchildren;
(f) Dating partner of the respondent; or
(g) Person who is acting or has acted as the
respondent's legal guardian;
(3) "Firearm", any handgun, rifle, shotgun, or other
instrument or device capable or intended to be capable of
discharging bullets, cartridges, or other explosive charges;
(4) "Petitioner", the person who petitions for an
extreme risk protection order under sections 571.801 to
571.815;
(5) "Respondent", the person who is identified as the
respondent in a petition filed under sections 571.801 to
571.815.
571.803. 1. A family or household member of the
respondent or a law enforcement officer or agency may
request a temporary extreme risk protection order without
notice to the respondent by including in the petition for an
extreme risk protection order an affidavit, signed under

SB 1158 4
oath and penalty of perjury, supporting the issuance of a
temporary extreme risk protection order that sets forth the
facts to establish the grounds of the petition or the reason
for believing the grounds exist. The petition shall comply
with the requirements of subsection 3 of section 571.804.
If an application described under section 632.305 is also
filed relating to the respondent, the court may hear that
application at the same time as a hearing for an extreme
risk protection order.
2. In considering whether to issue a temporary extreme
risk protection order under this section, the court shall
consider all relevant evidence, including the evidence
described under subsection 3 of section 571.805.
3. If a court finds by a preponderance of the evidence
that, based on the evidence presented under subsection 3 of
section 571.805, the respondent poses a significant risk of
causing personal injury to self or others by having in his
or her custody or control a firearm or by purchasing,
possessing, or receiving a firearm, the court shall issue a
temporary extreme risk protection order.
4. The court shall hold a temporary extreme risk
protection order hearing in person or by telephone on the
day the petition is filed or on the court day immediately
following the day the petition is filed.
5. (1) In accordance with subsection 1 of section
571.805, the court shall schedule a hearing within seven
days after the issuance of a temporary extreme risk
protection order to determine if a one-hundred-eighty-two-
day extreme risk protection order should be issued. Notice
of the hearing date shall be included with the temporary
extreme risk protection order served on the respondent. The
court shall provide notice of the hearing date to the

SB 1158 5
petitioner. Either party may request a different date for
the hearing that is beyond the initial seven days but no
later than an additional seven days from the issuance of the
temporary extreme risk protection order with good cause
shown. If the court reschedules the hearing, the court
shall provide notice of the new date to the petitioner and
respondent, and the temporary extreme risk protection order
shall stay in effect until the new hearing date.
(2) Any issued temporary extreme risk protection order
shall expire on the date and time of the hearing on the
extreme risk protection order petition or upon the
withdrawal of the petition.
6. A temporary extreme risk protection order shall
include:
(1) A statement of the grounds asserted for the order;
(2) The date and time the order is issued;
(3) The date and time the order expires;
(4) The address of the court in which any responsive
pleading shall be filed;
(5) The date and time of the scheduled hearing;
(6) The requirements for surrender of firearms under
section 571.809; and
(7) The following statement:
To the subject of this temporary extreme risk
protection order:
This order is valid until the date and time
noted above. You shall not have in your
custody or control a firearm or purchase,
possess, receive, or attempt to purchase or
receive a firearm while this order is in
effect. You must immediately surrender to the
__________ (law enforcement agency in the

SB 1158 6
jurisdiction where the respondent resides) all
firearms in your custody, control, or
possession, and any concealed carry permit
issued to you. A hearing will be held on the
date and at the time noted above to determine
if a full extreme risk protection order should
be issued. Failure to appear at that hearing
may result in a court entering an order
against you that is valid for one hundred
eighty-two days. You may seek the advice of
an attorney as to any matter connected with
this order.
7. A law enforcement officer shall serve a temporary
extreme risk protection order concurrently with the notice
of hearing and petition in the same manner as under section
571.805 for service of the notice of hearing where the
respondent resides or where the firearms of concern are
located.
8. (1) If the court issues a temporary extreme risk
protection order, the court shall state the particular
reasons for the court's issuance.
(2) If the court declines to issue a temporary extreme
risk protection order, the court shall state the particular
reasons for the court's denial.
571.804. 1. A petition for an extreme risk protection
order may be filed by a family or household member of the
respondent or a law enforcement officer or agency. If the
petition is filed by a law enforcement officer or agency,
the officer or agency shall be represented in any judicial
proceeding by a county or city attorney upon request. If
the petition is filed by a family or household member, the
petitioner, to the best of his or her ability, shall notify
the law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the

SB 1158 7
respondent resides or where the firearms are located of the
petition and of the hearing date with enough advance notice
to allow for participation or attendance.
2. A petition for an extreme risk protection order
shall be filed with a court in the county where the
respondent resides or where the firearms are located.
3. A petition shall:
(1) Allege that the respondent poses a significant
risk of causing personal injury to self or others by having
in his or her custody or control a firearm or by purchasing,
possessing, or receiving a firearm. The allegation shall be
accompanied by an affidavit, signed under oath and penalty
of perjury, stating the specific statements, actions, or
facts that give rise to a reasonable fear of future
dangerous acts by the respondent;
(2) Identify the number, types, and locations of any
firearms the petitioner believes to be in the respondent's
current ownership, possession, custody, or control;
(3) Identify whether the respondent is a party to an
existing domestic abuse protection order; and
(4) Identify any pending lawsuit, complaint, petition,
or other action between the parties to the petition pursuant
to Missouri law or federal law.
4. The court shall verify the terms of any existing
order identified under subdivision (3) of subsection 3 of
this section governing the parties. The court shall not
delay granting relief because of the existence of a pending
action between the parties or the necessity of verifying the
terms of an existing order. A petition for an extreme risk
protection order may be granted regardless of a pending
action between the parties.

SB 1158 8
5. If the petitioner is a law enforcement officer or
agency, the petitioner shall make a good-faith effort to
provide notice to a family or household member of the
respondent and to any known third party who may be at risk
of violence. The notice shall state that the petitioner
intends to file, or has already so filed, a petition for an
extreme risk protection order and shall include referrals to
appropriate resources including, but not limited to, mental
health, domestic violence, and counseling resources. The
petitioner shall attest in the petition to having provided
the notice or attest to the steps that will be taken to
provide the notice.
6. If the petition states that disclosure of the
petitioner's address would risk harm to the petitioner or
any family or household member of the petitioner, the
petitioner's address may be omitted from all documents filed
with the court. If the petitioner has not disclosed an
address under this subsection, the petitioner shall
designate an alternative address at which the respondent may
serve notice of any motions. If the petitioner is a law
enforcement officer or agency, the address of record shall
be that of the law enforcement agency.
7. A court or public agency shall not charge a fee for
filing or service of process to a petitioner seeking relief
under sections 571.801 to 571.815. A petitioner shall be
provided the necessary number of certified copies, forms,
and instructional brochures free of charge.
8. A person shall not be required to post a bond to
obtain relief in any proceeding under this section.
9. The associate circuit court and circuit courts of
the state of Missouri shall have jurisdiction over
proceedings under sections 571.801 to 571.815.

SB 1158 9
571.805. 1. (1) Upon receipt of the petition, the
court shall order a hearing and issue a notice to the
respondent. The court shall provide the notice of the
hearing no later than one court day after the date of the
extreme risk protection order petition. The court may
schedule a hearing by telephone to reasonably accommodate a
disability or, in exceptional circumstances, to protect a
petitioner from potential harm. The court shall require
assurances of the petitioner's identity before conducting a
telephonic hearing.
(2) On or before the next court day, the court clerk
shall forward a copy of the notice of the hearing and
petition to the law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction
where the respondent resides or where the firearms are
located for service upon the respondent.
(3) A copy of the notice of hearing and petition shall
be served upon the respondent. Service issued under this
section shall take precedence over the service of other
documents unless the other documents are of a similar
emergency nature.
(4) The court may, as provided under section 571.803,
issue a temporary extreme risk protection order pending the
hearing ordered under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
The temporary extreme risk protection order shall be served
concurrently with the notice of hearing and petition.
2. Upon hearing the matter, if the court finds by
clear and convincing evidence, based on the evidence
presented under subsection 3 of this section, that the
respondent poses a significant risk of causing personal
injury to self or others by having in his or her custody or
control a firearm or by purchasing, possessing, or receiving

SB 1158 10
a firearm, the court shall issue an extreme risk protection
order for a period of one hundred eighty-two days.
3. In determining whether grounds for an extreme risk
protection order exist, the court may consider any relevant
evidence including, but not limited to:
(1) A recent act or credible threat of violence by the
respondent against self or others, regardless of whether
such violence or credible threat of violence involved a
firearm;
(2) A pattern of acts or credible threats of violence
by the respondent within the past year including, but not
limited to, acts or credible threats of violence by the
respondent against self or others;
(3) Any relevant mental health issues of the
respondent;
(4) A violation of an order of protection issued under
chapter 455, or a similar order issued by another state, by
the respondent;
(5) A previous or existing extreme risk protection
order issued against the respondent and any violation of a
previous or existing extreme risk protection order;
(6) A conviction of the respondent for a crime that
includes an underlying factual basis of domestic violence as
defined under section 455.010;
(7) The respondent's ownership, access to, or intent
to possess a firearm;
(8) A credible threat of or the unlawful or reckless
use of a firearm by the respondent;
(9) The history of use, attempted use, or threatened
use of unlawful physical force by the respondent against
another person, or the respondent's history of stalking
under section 565.225 or 565.227;

SB 1158 11
(10) Any prior arrest of the respondent for a crime
listed under chapter 565 or 566 or section 578.012;
(11) Corroborated evidence of the abuse of controlled
substances or alcohol by the respondent; and
(12) Evidence of recent acquisition of a firearm or
ammunition by the respondent.
4. The court may:
(1) Examine under oath the petitioner, the respondent,
and any witnesses they may produce or, in lieu of
examination, consider sworn affidavits of the petitioner,
the respondent, and any witnesses they may produce; and
(2) Request a probation officer to conduct a criminal
history record check related to the respondent and provide
the results to the court under seal.
5. The court shall allow the petitioner and respondent
to present evidence, cross-examine witnesses, and be
represented by an attorney at the hearing.
6. In a hearing under sections 571.801 to 571.815, the
rules of evidence shall apply to the same extent as in a
full order of protection proceeding under chapter 455.
7. During the hearing, the court shall consider any
available mental health evaluation or chemical dependency
evaluation provided to the court.
8. An extreme risk protection order shall include:
(1) A statement of the grounds supporting the issuance
of the order;
(2) The date and time the order is issued;
(3) The date and time the order expires;
(4) The address of the court in which any responsive
pleading shall be filed;
(5) The requirements for relinquishment of firearms
under section 571.809; and

SB 1158 12
(6) The following statement:
To the subject of this extreme risk protection order:
This order will last until the date and time noted
above. If you have not done so already, you must
100 immediately surrender any firearms in your custody,
101 control, or possession and any concealed carry permit
102 issued to you. You shall not have in your custody or
103 control a firearm or purchase, possess, receive, or
104 attempt to purchase or receive a firearm while this
105 order is in effect. You have the right to request
106 one hearing to terminate this order during the period
107 that this order is in effect, starting from the date
108 of this order and continuing through any renewals.
109 You may seek the advice of an attorney as to any
110 matter connected with this order.
111 9. If the court issues an extreme risk protection
112 order, the court shall inform the respondent that he or she
113 may request termination of the order in the manner
114 prescribed under section 571.808. The court shall provide
115 the respondent with a form to request a termination hearing.
116 10. (1) If the court issues an extreme risk
117 protection order, the court shall state the particular
118 reasons for the court's issuance.
119 (2) If the court denies the issuance of an extreme
120 risk protection order, the court shall state the particular
121 reasons for the court's denial.
571.806. 1. An extreme risk protection order issued
under section 571.805 shall be served personally upon the
respondent, except as otherwise provided under sections
571.801 to 571.815.

SB 1158 13
2. The law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction
where the respondent resides or where the firearms are
located shall serve the respondent personally.
3. The court clerk shall forward a copy of the extreme
risk protection order no later than the next court day to
the law enforcement agency specified in the order for
service. Service of an extreme risk protection order shall
take precedence over the service of other documents unless
the other documents are of a similar emergency nature.
4. If the law enforcement agency cannot complete
service upon the respondent within five days, the law
enforcement agency shall notify the petitioner. The
petitioner shall then provide any additional information
regarding the respondent's location to the law enforcement
agency to effect service. The law enforcement agency may
request additional time to allow for the proper and safe
planning and execution of the court order.
5. If an extreme risk protection order entered by the
court states that the respondent appeared in person before
the court, the necessity for further service is waived, and
proof of service of the order shall not be necessary.
6. Returns of service under sections 571.801 to
571.815 shall be made in accordance with the applicable
court rules.
7. If notice of an extreme risk protection order
hearing cannot be served and if the respondent fails to
appear at the hearing, the court may issue an extreme risk
protection order under section 571.805.
571.808. 1. The respondent may submit one written
request for a hearing to terminate an extreme risk
protection order for the period that the order is in
effect. Upon receipt of the request for a hearing to

SB 1158 14
terminate an extreme risk protection order, the court shall
set a date for a hearing. Notice of the request shall be
served on the petitioner. The hearing shall occur no sooner
than fourteen days and no later than twenty-eight days after
the date of service of the request upon the petitioner. The
court shall terminate the extreme risk protection order if
the respondent establishes by clear and convincing evidence
that the respondent does not continue to pose a significant
risk of personal injury to self or others by having in his
or her custody or control a firearm or by purchasing,
possessing, or receiving a firearm. The court may consider
any relevant evidence, including evidence of the
considerations listed under subsection 3 of section 571.805.
2. (1) The court shall notify the petitioner of the
impending expiration of an extreme risk protection order
sixty-three calendar days before the date that the order
expires.
(2) A petitioner, a family or household member of a
respondent, or a law enforcement officer or agency may, by
motion, request a renewal of an extreme risk protection
order at any time within sixty-three calendar days before
the expiration of the order.
(3) Upon receipt of the motion to renew, the court
shall order that a hearing be held no later than fourteen
days after the filing of the motion to renew. The court may
schedule a hearing by telephone in the manner prescribed
under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 571.805.
The respondent shall be personally served in the same manner
prescribed under subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection 1 of
section 571.805.
(4) In determining whether to renew an extreme risk
protection order, the court shall consider all relevant

SB 1158 15
evidence and follow the same procedure as provided under
section 571.805.
(5) If the court finds by clear and convincing
evidence that, based on the evidence presented under
subsection 3 of section 571.805, the respondent continues to
pose a significant risk of personal injury to self or others
by having in his or her custody or control a firearm or by
purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm, the court
shall renew the order for a period of time the court deems
appropriate, not to exceed one hundred eighty-two days. In
the order, the court shall set a return date to review the
order no later than thirty-five days prior to the expiration
of the order. However, if, after notice, the motion for
renewal is uncontested and the petitioner seeks no
modification of the order, the order may be renewed on the
basis of the petitioner's motion or affidavit, signed under
oath and penalty of perjury, stating that there has been no
material change in relevant circumstances since the entry of
the order and stating the reason for the requested renewal.
571.809. 1. (1) Upon issuance of an extreme risk
protection order under sections 571.801 to 571.815,
including a temporary extreme risk protection order, the
court shall order the respondent to surrender all firearms
by either:
(a) Selling or transferring possession of a firearm to
a federally licensed firearms dealer defined under 18 U.S.C.
Section 921, as amended. However, this paragraph shall not
be interpreted to require any federally licensed firearms
dealer to purchase or accept possession of any firearm. If
the respondent elects to sell his or her firearms, the
respondent is entitled to the proceeds; or

SB 1158 16
(b) Arranging for the storage of a firearm by a law
enforcement agency.
(2) The court shall order the respondent to surrender
any concealed carry permit to the law enforcement officer
serving the extreme risk protection order.
2. (1) The law enforcement agency serving an extreme
risk protection order, including a temporary extreme risk
protection order, in which the petitioner is not a law
enforcement agency or officer, shall request that the
respondent immediately surrender all firearms in his or her
custody, control, or possession and any concealed carry
permit issued to the respondent and shall conduct any search
permitted by law for such firearms or permit. After the law
enforcement agency or officer has custody of the firearms,
the respondent may inform the law enforcement officer of his
or her preference for sale, transfer, or storage of the
firearms as specified under subsection 1 of this section.
If the respondent elects to sell or transfer the firearms to
a federally licensed firearms dealer described under 18
U.S.C. Section 923, as amended, the law enforcement officer
or agency shall maintain custody of the firearms until they
are sold or transferred. The law enforcement officer shall
take possession of all firearms and any such permit
belonging to the respondent that are surrendered, in plain
sight, or discovered pursuant to a lawful search.
Alternatively, if personal service by the law enforcement
agency is not possible or not required because the
respondent was present at the extreme risk protection order
hearing, the respondent shall surrender the firearms and any
concealed carry permit after being served with the order by
alternate service or after the hearing at which the
respondent was present.

SB 1158 17
(2) If the petitioner for an extreme risk protection
order is a law enforcement agency or officer, the law
enforcement officer serving the extreme risk protection
order shall take custody of the respondent's firearms
pursuant to the search warrant for firearms possessed by a
dangerous person if a warrant is obtained. If the law
enforcement agency obtains a search warrant for firearms
possessed by a dangerous person, the law enforcement officer
shall request that the respondent immediately surrender all
firearms in his or her custody, control, or possession and
any concealed carry permit issued to the respondent and
conduct any search permitted by law for such firearms or
permit. After the law enforcement agency or officer has
custody of the firearms, the respondent may inform the law
enforcement officer of his or her preference for sale,
transfer, or storage of the firearms. The law enforcement
officer shall request that the respondent immediately
surrender any concealed carry permit issued to the
respondent and conduct any search permitted by law for the
permit.
3. At the time of surrender or taking custody, a law
enforcement officer taking possession of a firearm or a
concealed carry permit shall issue a receipt identifying all
firearms and any permit that is surrendered or seized and
provide a copy of the receipt to the respondent. Within
seventy-two hours after service of the order, the officer
serving the order shall file the original receipt with the
court and shall ensure that his or her law enforcement
agency retains a copy of the receipt or, if the officer does
not take custody of any firearms, shall file a statement to
that effect with the court.

SB 1158 18
4. Upon the sworn statement or testimony of the
petitioner or of any law enforcement officer alleging
probable cause that the respondent has failed to comply with
the surrender of firearms as required by an extreme risk
protection order, the court shall determine whether probable
cause exists to believe that the respondent failed to
surrender all firearms in his or her custody, control, or
possession. If probable cause exists, the court shall issue
a search warrant that states with particularity the places
to be searched and the items to be seized.
5. If a person other than the respondent claims title
to any firearms surrendered or seized under this section and
the law enforcement agency determines the person is the
lawful owner of the firearm, the firearm shall be returned
to the person if:
(1) The firearm is removed from the respondent's
custody, control, or possession and the lawful owner agrees
to store the firearm so that the respondent does not have
access to or control of the firearm; and
(2) The firearm is not otherwise unlawfully possessed
by the lawful owner.
6. (1) Within twenty-four hours of the issuance of an
extreme risk protection order, a respondent shall either:
(a) File proof with the court that issued the order
100 showing that the respondent has relinquished or removed all
101 firearms previously in the respondent's custody, control, or
102 possession and surrendered any concealed carry permit issued
103 to the respondent. The respondent shall attest to the court
104 that no firearms are currently in the respondent's custody,
105 control, or possession and that the respondent does not
106 currently have a concealed carry permit; or
107 (b) Attest to the court that:

SB 1158 19
108 a. At the time the order was issued, the respondent
109 did not have any firearms in the respondent's custody,
110 control, or possession and did not have a concealed carry
111 permit; and
112 b. The respondent does not currently have any firearms
113 in the respondent's custody, control, or possession and does
114 not currently have a concealed carry permit.
115 (2) If the respondent does not comply with the
116 requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection within
117 the twenty-four-hour period, the court clerk shall inform a
118 law enforcement agency in the county in which the court is
119 located that the respondent has not complied with
120 subdivision (1) of this subsection. The law enforcement
121 agency shall make a good-faith effort to determine whether
122 the respondent has failed to relinquish any firearms in the
123 respondent's custody, control, or possession or failed to
124 surrender a concealed carry permit.
125 7. The POST commission, as defined under section
126 590.010, shall develop model policies and procedures by
127 December 1, 2026, regarding the acceptance, storage, sale,
128 and return of firearms required to be surrendered under
129 sections 571.801 to 571.815 or seized under subsection 5 of
130 section 542.271 and shall provide those model policies and
131 procedures to all law enforcement agencies within the
132 state. Each law enforcement agency shall adopt the model
133 policies and procedures or adopt their own policies and
134 procedures before January 1, 2027.
571.810. 1. If an extreme risk protection order or
temporary extreme risk protection order is terminated or
expires without renewal, any law enforcement agency holding
a firearm surrendered or seized under section 571.809 or
seized under subsection 5 of section 542.271 shall return

SB 1158 20
the firearm requested by a respondent only after confirming,
through a criminal history record check, that the respondent
is currently eligible to own or possess a firearm under
federal and state law and after confirming with the court
that the extreme risk protection order has terminated or has
expired without renewal.
2. Any firearm surrendered or seized under section
571.809 or seized under subsection 5 of section 542.271 that
remains unclaimed by the lawful owner for at least one year
from the date the temporary extreme risk protection order or
extreme risk protection order expired, whichever is later,
shall be disposed in accordance with the law enforcement
agency's policies and procedures for the disposal of
firearms in police custody.
571.811. 1. The court clerk shall enter an extreme
risk protection order or temporary extreme risk protection
order into a statewide judicial information system on the
same day the order is issued.
2. The court clerk shall forward a copy of an extreme
risk protection order or temporary extreme risk protection
order the same day the order is issued to the Missouri state
highway patrol and the law enforcement agency specified in
the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order, the law
enforcement agency specified in the order shall enter the
order into the National Instant Criminal Background Check
System (NICS), any other federal or state computer-based
systems used by law enforcement agencies or others to
identify prohibited purchasers of firearms, and the Missouri
uniform law enforcement system (MULES). The order shall
remain in each system for the period stated in the order,
and the law enforcement agency shall expunge from the
systems only orders that have expired or been terminated.

SB 1158 21
Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence
information system shall be notice to all law enforcement
agencies of the existence of the order. The order shall be
fully enforceable anywhere in the state.
3. The issuing court shall, within three court days
after issuance of an extreme risk protection order or a
temporary extreme risk protection order, forward all
identifying information the court has regarding the
respondent, along with the date the order is issued, to the
county sheriff in the jurisdiction where the respondent
resides. Upon receipt of the information, the county
sheriff shall determine if the respondent has a concealed
carry permit. If the respondent does have a concealed carry
permit, the issuing county sheriff shall immediately revoke
the permit. The respondent may reapply for a concealed
carry permit after the temporary extreme risk protection
order and extreme risk protection order, if ordered, are no
longer in effect.
4. If an extreme risk protection order is terminated
before its expiration date, the court clerk shall forward,
on the same day as the termination order, a copy of the
termination order to the highway patrol and the law
enforcement agency specified in the termination order. Upon
receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency specified
in the termination order shall promptly remove the order
from any computer-based system in which it was entered under
subsection 2 of this section.
571.812. Any person who has in his or her custody or
control a firearm or purchases, possesses, or receives a
firearm with knowledge that he or she is prohibited from
doing so by an extreme risk protection order or temporary
extreme risk protection order shall be guilty of a class B

SB 1158 22
misdemeanor. However, such person shall be guilty of a
class E felony if the person has two or more previous
convictions for violating an extreme risk protection order.
571.813. Sections 571.801 to 571.815 shall not affect
the ability of a law enforcement officer to remove a firearm
or concealed carry permit from a person or conduct a search
and seizure for any firearm pursuant to other lawful
authority.
571.814. Except as provided under section 571.812,
sections 571.801 to 571.815 shall not impose criminal or
civil liability on any person or entity for acts or
omissions made in good faith related to obtaining an extreme
risk protection order or a temporary extreme risk protection
order including, but not limited to, reporting, declining to
report, investigating, declining to investigate, filing, or
declining to file a petition under sections 571.801 to
571.815.
571.815. 1. (1) The office of state courts
administrator shall develop standard petitions, extreme risk
protection order forms, and temporary extreme risk
protection order forms in more than one language consistent
with state judicial branch practices. The standard petition
and order forms shall be used after December 31, 2026, for
all extreme risk protection order petitions and extreme risk
protection orders. The office of state courts administrator
may consult with interested parties in developing the
petitions and forms. The materials shall be available
online consistent with state judicial branch practices.
(2) The extreme risk protection order form shall
include, in a conspicuous location, notice of criminal
penalties resulting from violation of the order and the
following statement:

SB 1158 23
You have the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain
from violating this extreme risk protection order's
provisions. Only the court can change the order and
only upon written motion.
2. A court clerk for each judicial district shall
create a community resource list that includes, but is not
limited to, crisis intervention, mental health, substance
abuse, interpreter, counseling, and other relevant resources
serving the county in which the court is located. The court
shall make the community resource list available as part of
or in addition to the materials described under subdivision
(1) of subsection 1 of this section.
3. The office of state courts administrator shall
distribute a master copy of the standard petition and
extreme risk protection order forms to all circuit courts.
4. Before March first of each year, the office of
state courts administrator shall issue to the speaker of the
house of representatives, president pro tempore of the
senate, chief justice of the supreme court, and governor
statistics related to extreme risk protection orders in the
preceding calendar year. The statistics shall include, but
not be limited to:
(1) The number of petitions filed for temporary
extreme risk protection orders;
(2) The number of petitions filed for extreme risk
protection orders;
(3) The number of temporary extreme risk protection
orders issued and denied;
(4) The number of extreme risk protection orders
issued and denied;

SB 1158 24
(5) The number of temporary extreme risk protection
orders terminated;
(6) The number of extreme risk protection orders
terminated; and
(7) The number of extreme risk protection orders
renewed.
✓